Tennessee, session 114, SB1838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-301, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) The board of regents and each state university board shall adopt a tenure
policy for faculty at the institutions governed by the board. The policy must allow faculty
members who received tenure before July 1, 2026, to retain the status in accordance
with the policy, but must not allow the institutions governed by the board to confer any
new tenure status on faculty members on or after July 1, 2026.
(b) Pursuant to this part, the board shall:
(1) Define the nature of tenure and the rights and responsibilities of
faculty members with tenure in accordance with this section;
(2) Provide for the termination of faculty members with tenure for
adequate cause, for retirement or disability, or for financial or curricular reasons
in the discretion of the board or its designee; and
(3) Provide for all other matters relating to tenure deemed necessary by
the board in accordance with this section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-1903(2), is amended by
deleting "tenure," and "or tenure".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-9-209(d)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivision (H) and substituting:
SB1838
009511
- 1 -

(H) Adopt a policy governing the granting and removal of tenure for faculty
members; provided, that the policy must allow faculty members who received tenure
before July 1, 2026, to retain the status in accordance with the policy, but must not allow
the institutions governed by the board to confer any new tenure status on faculty
members on or after July 1, 2026;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-9-1603, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d) Faculty of the institute shall not be:
(1) Awarded tenure on or after July 1, 2026; or
(2) Required to gain joint appointment in another division of the
University of Tennessee.
SECTION 5. For purposes of adopting policies, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026, the
public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009511